Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 5. Transferees and Creditors of Partner.

§ 50-73.105.
Partner not co-owner of partnership property.

A partner is not a co-owner of partnership property and has no interest in partnership property which can be transferred, either voluntarily or involuntarily.

History.

1996, c. 292.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 5; 14A M.J. Partnership, §§ 19, 43.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Priority of orders. —

Since the charging order issued to a partner was prior in time, it had priority over the charging order issued to the creditors; viewing the creditors and the partner as judgment creditors, priority against the debtor’s partnership interest had to be determined in the sequence in which their charging orders were granted. Ainslie v. Inman, 92 Va. Cir. 425, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 547 (Chesapeake Oct. 26, 2001), aff'd,

265 Va. 347

, 577 S.E.2d 246, 2003 Va. LEXIS 25 (2003).

§ 50-73.106.
Partner’s transferable interest in partnership.

The only transferable interest of a partner in the partnership is the partner’s share of the profits and losses of the partnership and the partner’s right to receive distributions. The interest is personal property.

History.

1996, c. 292.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 5; 14A M.J. Partnership, §§ 19, 43.

§ 50-73.107.
Transfer of partner’s transferable interest.

A transfer, in whole or in part, of a partner’s transferable interest in the partnership:

Is permissible;

Does not by itself cause the partner’s dissociation or a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business; and

Does not, as against the other partners or the partnership, entitle the transferee, during the continuance of the partnership, to participate in the management or conduct of the partnership business, to require access to information concerning partnership transactions, or to inspect or copy the partnership books or records.

A transferee of a partner’s transferable interest in the partnership has a right:

To receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled;

To receive upon the dissolution and winding up of the partnership business, in accordance with the transfer, the net amount otherwise distributable to the transferor; and

To seek under subdivision 6 of §

50-73.117

a judicial determination that it is equitable to wind up the partnership business.

In a dissolution and winding up, a transferee is entitled to an account of partnership transactions only from the date of the latest account agreed to by all of the partners.

Upon transfer, the transferor retains the rights and duties of a partner other than the interest in distributions transferred.

A partnership need not give effect to a transferee’s rights under this section until it has notice of the transfer.

A transfer of a partner’s transferable interest in the partnership in violation of a restriction or prohibition on transfer contained in the partnership agreement is ineffective as to a person having notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

History.

1996, c. 292.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 5; 14A M.J. Partnership, §§ 19, 43.

§ 50-73.108.
Partner’s transferable interest subject to charging order.

On application by a judgment creditor of a partner or of a partner’s transferee, a court having jurisdiction may charge the transferable interest of the judgment debtor to satisfy the judgment. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the right to receive any distribution or distributions to which the judgment debtor would otherwise have been entitled in respect of the interest.

A charging order constitutes a lien on the judgment debtor’s transferable interest in the partnership.

This chapter does not deprive a partner or a partner’s assignee of a right under exemption laws with respect to the judgment debtor’s interest in the partnership.

The entry of a charging order is the exclusive remedy by which a judgment creditor of a partner or of a partner’s transferee may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s transferable interest in the partnership.

No creditor of a partner or of a partner’s assignee shall have any right to obtain possession of, or otherwise exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to, the property of the partnership.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2006, c. 912.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 912 rewrote the section.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Priority of orders. —

Since the charging order issued to a partner was prior in time, it had priority over the charging order issued to the creditors; viewing the creditors and the partner as judgment creditors, priority against the debtor’s partnership interest had to be determined in the sequence in which their charging orders were granted. Ainslie v. Inman, 92 Va. Cir. 425, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 547 (Chesapeake Oct. 26, 2001), aff'd,

265 Va. 347

, 577 S.E.2d 246, 2003 Va. LEXIS 25 (2003).